src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SAPMI !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.
                                      +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                    ;
                                   +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                                     RHyph                ;
                                         < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V                ;
                   +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá                                K                    ;
                   +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi                                K                    ;
                                             +N:%>                                     EssV                 ;
                                             +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-              ; ! Px sublexicon
                                             +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                                    +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI              ; ! Ill sublexicon
                                      +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K                    ;
                                      +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K                    ;
                                      +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V                ;
                                      +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V                ;
                                      +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s                                  K                    ;
                       +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n                                  K                    ; ! !SOUTH
                                      +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%>                               NPxC                 ;
                                      +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K                    ;
                                    +N+Err/Orth:%>X5                                   GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                                             +N:%>%^DISIMP                             GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                                             +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-               ; ! AG Px
                                             +N:%>X8                                   GOADE-IU-            ; ! Ditto (?)
                                  +N+Err/DerSub:X4X7                                   KEAHTTA              ;
                                  +N+Err/DerSub:X4                                     KEAHTTA              ;
                                             +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
                                             +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2      ;
                                             +N:                                       DenominalNounsV      ;
! +N+Use/-Spell+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giella+Der2+Der/t:%>X4giel                               AGAdj                ; !-gielat -gielagat
!              +N+Use/-Spell+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giel:%>X4giel                               LEXATTR              ; !-giel

LEXICON XGIELLA !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Nouns. No nom-compounding, short gen.
 +N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giella+Der2+Der/t:%>X4giel AGAdj    ; !-gielat -gielagat
              +N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giel:%>X4giel LEXATTR  ; !-giel
                                   :giella   GOAHTI-A ;


LEXICON BEALLE !!= * __@CODE@__ words ending -bealle. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.
                           +N:e%>                                      GOAHTICMP            ;
                    +N+Sg+Nom:e                                        K                    ;
                       < "+N":0 "+Sg":"e" "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V                ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:e»X7viđá                                 K                    ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:e»X7viđi                                 K                    ;
                           +N:e%>                                      EssV                 ;
                           +N:%>áX2                                    GOAHTA-              ; ! Px sublexicon
                    +N+Sg+Ill:á%>j                                     K                    ; !
           +N+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:a%>j                                     K                    ; !
                    +N+Sg+Gen:e%>X4                                    K                    ;
                    +N+Sg+Acc:e%>X4                                    K                    ;
                    +N+Sg+Gen:e%>X4                                    NPx3V                ;
                    +N+Sg+Acc:e%>X4                                    NPx3V                ;
                    +N+Sg+Loc:e%>X4s                                   K                    ;
     +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:e%>X4n                                   K                    ; ! !SOUTH
                    +N+Sg+Loc:e%>X4st%>                                NPxC                 ;
                    +N+Pl+Nom:e%>X4t                                   K                    ;
                  +N+Err/Orth:i%>X5                                    GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                           +N:i%>%^DISIMP                              GODII-               ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
                           +N:á%>X6                                    GOADA-               ; ! AG Px
                           +N:e                                        DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
                           +N:á                                        DenominalAdjsV2      ;
                           +N:á                                        DenominalNounsV      ;
                   +Cmp/SgGen:e                                        R                    ; !Note! Same entry under GOADI-
