src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
asibealle:asi#beall BEALLE ;
bealle+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+CmpN/Only:beall BEALLE ;
boaššobealle:boaššo#beall BEALLE ;
dievddubealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+Hum+Group:dievddu#beall BEALLE ;
diibmobealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time+Use/Sub:diibmo#beall BEALLE ;
doaresbealli+Use/Sub:doares#beall BEALLE ;
duogábealle+Use/LexSub:duogá#beall BEALLE ;
dážabealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:dáža#beall BEALLE ;
dáččabealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group:dáčča#beall BEALLE ;
eadnebealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group+Use/Sub:eatni#beall BEALLE ;
eadnebealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eadne#beall BEALLE ;
fávllabealli+Use/LexSub:fávlla#beall BEALLE ;
giehtatbealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:giehtat#beall BEALLE ;
gilggabealle+Use/Sub:gilgga#beall BEALLE ;
gilobealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:gilo#beall BEALLE ;
giđabealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Time:giđa#beall BEALLE ;
guolggabealle:guolgga#beall BEALLE ;
gáttabealli+Use/LexSub:gátta#beall BEALLE ;
ijabealle:ija#beall BEALLE ;
jahkebealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time+Use/Sub:jahke#beall BEALLE ;
kilobealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:kilo#beall BEALLE ;
lulábealli+Use/Sub:lulá#beall BEALLE ;
lávžebealle:lávže#beall BEALLE ;
maŋábealli+Use/LexSub:maŋá#beall BEALLE ;
mieđabealli:mieđa#beall BEALLE ;
mieđábealli:mieđá#beall BEALLE ;
muoŧŧábealle+Hum+Use/Sub:muossá#beall BEALLE ;
máttabealli+Use/Sub:mátta#beall BEALLE ;
niehkabealle:niehka#beall BEALLE ;
nieidabealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+Hum:nieida#beall BEALLE ;
nissonbealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+Hum+Group:nisson#beall BEALLE ;
norggabealli+Use/Sub:norgga#beall BEALLE ;
nuorttabealli+Use/Sub:nuortta#beall BEALLE ;
oabbábealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oabbá#beall BEALLE ;
oalgetbealle:oalget#beall BEALLE ;
oarjjabealli+Use/Sub:oarjja#beall BEALLE ;
oassebealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:oasse#beall BEALLE ;
olggobealli+Use/LexSub:olggo#beall BEALLE ;
orjješdavábealli+Use/Sub:orjješ#davá#beall BEALLE ;
orjješlulábealli+Use/Sub:orjješ#lulá#beall BEALLE ;
ovdabealli+Use/Sub:ovda#beall BEALLE ;
ovdabealli+Use/Sub:ovdda#beall BEALLE ;
rihtabealle:rihta#beall BEALLE ;
seainnebealle:seainne#beall BEALLE ;
sealggabealle:sealgga#beall BEALLE ;
sealggebealle:sealgge#beall BEALLE ;
selggobealli+Use/Sub:selggo#beall BEALLE ;
siskkabealli+Use/LexSub:siskka#beall BEALLE ;
siskkobealli+Use/LexSub:siskko#beall BEALLE ;
skárrebealle:skárre#beall BEALLE ;
suomabealli+Use/Sub:suoma#beall BEALLE ;
tiibmabealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time+Use/Sub:tiibma#beall BEALLE ;
tiibmobealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Time+Use/Sub:tiibmo#beall BEALLE ;
vielljabealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:viellja#beall BEALLE ;
vuoh'bealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vuoh'7#beall BEALLE ;
vuohppealle:vuohppeall BEALLE ;
vuolábealli+Use/Sub:vuolá#beall BEALLE ;
vuosttábealli+Use/Sub:vuosttá#beall BEALLE ;
áhkkubealle+Hum+Use/Sub:áhkko#beall BEALLE ;
áhččebealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Group+Use/Sub:áhči#beall BEALLE ;
áhččebealle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:áhčče#beall BEALLE ;
čipbealle:čip9#beall BEALLE ;
šipmárbealle:šipmár#beall BEALLE ;
čippealle:čippeall BEALLE ;
čoarvetbealli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani+Use/Sub:čoarvet#beall BEALLE ;
olggobealle:olggo#beall BEALLE ;
